Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.350

Removal of restrictive covenants—Hearing, notice.

Any county must hold a public hearing upon a proposal to remove, vacate, or extinguish a restrictive covenant from property owned by the county before the action is finalized. The public hearing must allow individuals to provide testimony regarding the proposed action. The county must provide notice of the public hearing at least ten days before the hearing at its usual place of business and issue a press release to local media providing the date, time, location, and reason for the public hearing. The notice must be posted on the county's website if it is updated for any reason before the hearing. The notice must also identify the property and provide a brief explanation of the restrictive covenant to be removed, vacated, or extinguished. Any member of the public, in person or by counsel, may submit testimony regarding the proposed action at the public hearing.

[ 2017 c 119 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—Finding—2017 c 119: See notes following RCW 35.21.960.